Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1237
Vessel propelled by sail and machinery; lights required.

Under the conditions prescribed in section 37-1232 and when propelled by sail and machinery, any vessel shall carry the lights required for a vessel propelled by machinery only.

Laws 1978, LB 21, § 37.